Oklahoma, session 2026, SB27.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-309, as


last amended by Section 6, Chapter 308, O.S.L. 2024 (63 O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 2-309), is amended to read as follows:


Section 2-309. A. 1. Except for dosages medically required


for a period not to exceed forty-eight (48) hours which are


administered by or on direction of a practitioner, other than a


pharmacist, or medication dispensed directly by a practitioner,


other than a pharmacist, to an ultimate user, no controlled


dangerous substance included in Schedule II, which is a prescription


drug as determined under regulation promulgated by the State Board


of Pharmacy, shall be dispensed without an electronic prescription

Req. No. 130 Page 1


of a practitioner; provided, that in emergency situations, as


prescribed by the State Board of Pharmacy by regulation, such drug


may be dispensed upon oral prescription reduced promptly to writing


and filed by the pharmacist in a manner to be prescribed by rules


and regulations of the Director of the Oklahoma State Bureau of


Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control.


2. Electronic prescribing shall be utilized for Schedules II,


III, IV and V, subject to the requirements set forth in 21 CFR,


Section 1311 et seq.


3. An electronic prescription with electronic signature may


serve as an original prescription, subject to the requirements set


forth in 21 CFR, Section 1311 et seq.


4. Prescriptions shall be retained in conformity with the


requirements of this section and Section 2-307 of this title. No


prescription for a Schedule II substance may be refilled.


5. The electronic prescription requirement provided for in this


section shall not apply to prescriptions for controlled dangerous


substances issued by any of the following:


a. a person licensed to practice veterinary medicine,


b. a practitioner who experiences temporary technological


or electrical failure or other extenuating


circumstance that prevents the prescription from being


transmitted electronically; provided, however, that



Req. No. 130 Page 2


the practitioner documents the reason for this


exception in the medical record of the patient,


c. a practitioner, other than a pharmacist, who dispenses


directly to an ultimate user,


d. a practitioner who orders a controlled dangerous


substance to be administered through an on-site


pharmacy in:


(1) a hospital as defined in Section 1-701 of this


title,


(2) a nursing facility as defined in Section 1-1902


of this title,


(3) a hospice inpatient facility as defined in


Section 1-860.2 of this title,


(4) an outpatient dialysis facility,


(5) a continuum of care facility as defined in


Section 1-890.2 of this title, or


(6) a penal institution listed in Section 509 of


Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


e. a practitioner who orders a controlled dangerous


substance to be administered through a hospice program


including, but not limited to, a hospice program that


provides hospice services in the private residence of


a patient or in a long-term care facility where the


patient resides. As used in this subparagraph,

Req. No. 130 Page 3


“hospice program” has the same meaning as provided by


Section 1-860.2 of this title,


f. a practitioner who writes a prescription to be


dispensed by a pharmacy located on federal property,


provided the practitioner documents the reason for


this exception in the medical record of the patient,


g. a practitioner that has received a waiver or extension


from his or her licensing board,


h. a practitioner who prescribes a controlled dangerous


substance for a supply that when taken as prescribed


would be consumed within seventy-two (72) hours, or


i. a practitioner who determines that an electronic


prescription cannot be issued in a timely manner and


the condition of the patient is at risk, or


j a practitioner who practices exclusively in one or


more medically underserved areas (MUAs) as designated


by the Health Resources and Services Administration.


This exemption shall not be available to a


practitioner who has been subject to disciplinary


action by the practitioner’s licensing board for a


violation related to the prescription of controlled


dangerous substances. The licensing board shall


communicate with and share necessary information with


the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous

Req. No. 130 Page 4


Drugs Control for the purpose of enforcement of this


subparagraph.


6. Electronic prescriptions may be utilized under the following


circumstances:


a. compounded prescriptions,


b. compounded infusion prescriptions, or


c. prescriptions issued under approved research


protocols.


7. A pharmacist who receives a written, oral or facsimile


prescription shall not be required to verify that the prescription


falls under one of the exceptions provided for in paragraph 6 of


this subsection. Pharmacists may continue to dispense medications


from otherwise valid written, oral or facsimile prescriptions that


are consistent with the provisions of this section.


8. Practitioners shall indicate in the health record of a


patient that an exception to the electronic prescription requirement


was utilized.


9. All prescriptions issued pursuant to paragraph 5 and


subparagraph c of paragraph 6 of this subsection shall be on an


official prescription form approved by the Oklahoma State Bureau of


Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control if not issued electronically.


10. a. Practitioners shall be registered with the Oklahoma


State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control


in order to purchase official prescription forms.

Req. No. 130 Page 5


Such registration shall include, but not be limited


to, the primary address and the address of each place


of business to be imprinted on official prescription


forms. Any change to a registered practitioner’s


registered address shall be promptly reported to the


practitioner’s licensing board and the Bureau by the


practitioner in a manner approved by the Bureau.


b. Where the Bureau has revoked the registration of a


registered practitioner, the Bureau may revoke or


cancel any official prescription forms in the


possession of the registered practitioner. Any


revocation or any suspension shall require the


registered practitioner to return all unused official


prescription forms to the Bureau within fifteen (15)


calendar days after the date of the written


notification.


c. A practitioner that has had any license to practice


terminated, revoked or suspended by a state or federal


agency may, upon restoration of such license or


certificate, register with the Bureau.


11. a. Official prescription forms shall be purchased at the


expense of the practitioner or the employer of the


practitioner from a list of vendors approved by the


Bureau.

Req. No. 130 Page 6


b. Official prescription forms issued to a registered


practitioner shall be imprinted with the primary


address and may include other addresses listed on the


registration of the practitioner to identify the place


of origin. Such prescriptions shall be sent only to


the primary address of the registered practitioner.


c. Official prescription forms of a registered


practitioner shall be used only by the practitioner


designated on the official prescription form.


d. The Bureau may revoke or cancel official prescription


forms in the possession of a registered practitioners


practitioner when the license of such practitioner is


suspended, terminated or revoked.


e. Official prescription forms of registered


practitioners who are deceased or who no longer


prescribe shall be returned to the Bureau at a


designated address. If the registered practitioner is


deceased, it is the responsibility of the registered


practitioner’s estate or lawful designee to return


such forms.


f. The Bureau may issue official prescription forms to


employees or agents of the Bureau and other government


agencies for the purpose of preventing, identifying,


investigating and prosecuting unacceptable or illegal

Req. No. 130 Page 7


practices by providers and other persons and assisting


in the recovery of overpayments under any program


operated by the state or paid for with state funds.


Such prescription forms shall be issued for this


purpose only to individuals who are authorized to


conduct investigations on behalf of the Bureau or


other government agencies as part of their official


duties. Individuals and agencies receiving such


prescription forms for this purpose shall provide


appropriate assurances to the Bureau that adequate


safeguards and security measures are in place to


prevent the use of such prescription forms for


anything other than official government purposes.


12. a. Adequate safeguards and security measures shall be


undertaken by registered practitioners holding


official prescription forms to assure against the


loss, destruction, theft or unauthorized use of the


forms. Registered practitioners shall maintain a


sufficient but not excessive supply of such forms in


reserve.


b. Registered practitioners shall immediately notify the


Bureau, in a manner designated by the Bureau, upon


their knowledge of the loss, destruction, theft or


unauthorized use of any official prescription forms

Req. No. 130 Page 8


issued to them, as well as the failure to receive


official prescription forms within a reasonable time


after ordering them from the Bureau.


c. Registered practitioners shall immediately notify the


Bureau upon their knowledge of any diversion or


suspected diversion of drugs pursuant to the loss,


theft or unauthorized use of prescriptions.


B. 1. Except for dosages medically required for a period not


to exceed seventy-two (72) hours which are administered by or on


direction of a practitioner other than a pharmacist or medication


dispensed directly by a practitioner, other than a pharmacist, to an


ultimate user, or the circumstances provided for in paragraphs 5 and


of subsection A of this section, no controlled dangerous substance


included in Schedule III or IV, which is a prescription drug as


determined under regulation promulgated by the State Board of


Pharmacy, shall be dispensed without an electronic prescription.


2. Any prescription for a controlled dangerous substance in


Schedule III, IV or V may not be filled or refilled more than six


(6) months after the date thereof or be refilled more than five


times after the date of the prescription, unless renewed by the


practitioner.


C. Whenever it appears to the Director of the Oklahoma State


Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control that a drug not


considered to be a prescription drug under existing state law or

Req. No. 130 Page 9


regulation of the State Board of Pharmacy should be so considered


because of its abuse potential, the Director shall so advise the


State Board of Pharmacy and furnish to the Board all available data


relevant thereto.


D. 1. “Prescription”, as used in this section, means a


written, oral or electronic order by a practitioner to a pharmacist


for a controlled dangerous substance for a particular patient, which


specifies the date of its issue, and the full name and address of


the patient and, if the controlled dangerous substance is prescribed


for an animal, the species of the animal, the name and quantity of


the controlled dangerous substance prescribed, the directions for


use, the name and address of the owner of the animal and, if


written, the signature of the practitioner. When electronically


prescribed, the full name of the patient may include the name and


species of the animal.


2. “Registered practitioner”, as used in this section, means a


licensed practitioner duly registered with the Oklahoma State Bureau


of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control authorized to purchase


official prescription forms.


E. No person shall solicit, dispense, receive or deliver any


controlled dangerous substance through the mail, unless the ultimate


user is personally known to the practitioner and circumstances


clearly indicate such method of delivery is in the best interest of


the health and welfare of the ultimate user.

Req. No. 130 Page 10


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-130 DC 12/16/2024 10:49:16 AM











































Req. No. 130 Page 11